Tennessee, session 114, HB1245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-189(a), is amended by deleting
"six (6) hours" and substituting "four (4) hours".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1245
003183
- 1 -